src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON declindef-idiosync   !!= * **@CODE@**
!! separate lexica for these entries:
!! oktat

oktahat+Pron+Indef:ovttaha OVTTAHAT ;
seammahat+Pron+Indef+Err/Lex:seammaha OVTTAHAT ; !
seammá+Pron+Indef+Attr+Err/Orth:seammahat # ; !
seammá+Pron+Indef+Nom+Sg+Err/Orth:seammahat # ; !
oktahat+Pron+Indef+Attr:oktahat K ;
aktahat+Pron+Indef+Attr:aktahat K ;
oktahat+Pron+Indef+Nom+Sg:oktahat K ;
aktahat+Pron+Indef+Nom+Sg:aktahat K ;

earrása+Pron+Indef:earrás EARRAS ;
!iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Nom:ieš#guhtet K ;			    Attr
!iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen+Err/Orth:ieš#guđet K ; !	    Attr
!!iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen+Err/Orth:ieš#guđet# NAMAT ; ! Attr
!iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Acc+Err/Orth:ieš#guđet K ; !	    Attr
simme+Pron+Indef+Err/Lex:simme SIMME ; !
seammá+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth-a-á:seamma SEAMMA ; !
seammá+Pron+Indef:seammá SEAMMA ;
!seammá+Pron+Indef+Attr+Use/-Spell:seamma# NAMAT ;
seammá+v1+Pron+Indef+Attr:seamma # ;
seammá+v2+Pron+Indef+Attr:seammá # ; !, dict says seamma ~ seammá (#seamma)
juoga+Pron+Indef:juo JUOGA ;
galle+Pron+Indef:galºl GALLE ; !
máŋga+Pron+Indef:máŋºga MANGA ;
máŋga+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth:maŋºga MANGA ;
máŋga+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth:mánºga MANGA ;
máŋga+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth:manºga MANGA ;
moadde+Pron+Indef:moadd GALLE ;
guktot+Pron+Indef:gukto indefdeclplcontr ;
juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:juogamij K-son ;
juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:juogamájd9 K-son ; !
juogamii+Pron+Indef:juogama%> oblintercas_indef ;




!! The indeclineable indefinites
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indeclindef   !!= * **@CODE@**
!ald+Err/Lex:ald9 iind ; ! Refl
áidna+Pron+Indef+Nom:áidna K ;
áidna+Pron+Indef+Attr:áidna K ;

buot+Pron+Indef+Attr:buot K ;
buot+Pron+Indef+Nom:buot K ;
buot+Pron+Indef+Acc:buot K ;
gait+Pron+Indef+Attr:gajt K ;
gait+Pron+Indef+Attr+Err/Orth-a-á:gájt K ;
gait+Pron+Indef+Nom:gajt K ;
gait+Pron+Indef+Acc:gajt K ;
eatnat+Pron+Indef+Attr:eatnat K ;
eatnat+Pron+Indef+Nom:eatnat K ;
eatnat+Pron+Indef+Acc:eatnat K ;
!buot+Use/-Spell:buot# NAMAT ;
!gait+Use/-Spell:gajt# NAMAT ;
!eatnat+Use/-Spell:eatnat# NAMAT ;
!fal iind ; ! cf. Nickel s. 126.
!gallát iind ; ! Bare Attr
goabbat+Pron+Indef+Nom:goabbat K ;
goabbat+Pron+Indef+Nom+Err/Orth-a-á:goabbát K ;
goabbat+Pron+Indef+Acc:goappat K ;
goabbat+Pron+Indef+Gen:goappat K ; !Ikke ihht. N/S s. 135, men i bruk i korpus: goappat bealde
!goabbat+Use/-Spell:goabbat# NAMAT ;
goappaš+Pron+Indef+Attr:goappaš K ;
goappaš+Pron+Indef+Attr+Err/Orth:goappeš K ;
!goappaš+Use/-Spell:goappaš# NAMAT ;
!goappašat iind ; ! thus both Nom and non-Nom. XXX.
guhtet+Pron+Indef+Nom:guhtet K ;
guhtet+Pron+Indef+Acc:guđet K ;
iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Nom:iešguhtet # ;
iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Acc:iešguđet # ;
iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Acc+Err/Orth:iešgudet # ;
iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen:iešguđet # ;
iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen+Err/Orth:iešgudet # ;
iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Attr:iešguđet # ;
iešguhtet+Pron+Indef+Attr+Err/Orth:iešgudet # ;
juohke+Pron+Indef+Attr:juohke K ;
!iešguđet+Use/-Spell:ieš#guđet# NAMAT ;
!iešguhtet+Use/-Spell:ieš#guhtet# NAMAT ;
!juohke+Use/-Spell:juohke# NAMAT ;
!ollu iind ; ! A og Adv
!olu iind ; ! A og Adv
visot+Pron+Indef+Attr:visot K ;
visot+Pron+Indef+Nom:visot K ;
visot+Pron+Indef+Acc:visot K ;
!visot+Use/-Spell:visot# NAMAT ;

!vaikko iind ; !This is CS, not pron
